District of Columbia statutes.
28-4502

Contract, combination, or conspiracy to restrain trade.

Every contract, combination in the form of a trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce all or any part of which is within the District of Columbia is declared to be illegal.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
Prescription drugs, unfair trade restraints, see § 48-804.02.
This section is referenced in § 28-4506.
1981 Ed., § 28-4502.